Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-5,202
Owner; maintain records.

Each owner shall retain at all times up-to-date maintenance and inspection records for each amusement ride as prescribed by the State Fire Marshal. The owner shall make such records available to the State Fire Marshal on request.

Laws 1987, LB 226, § 13;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-1813;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 38.